Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Regional Jail Authorities

441.800.
Creation of regional jail authority — Powers of authority.

Two (2) or more counties may by ordinances establish a regional jail authority.

The authority shall constitute a public body corporate and politic, exercising public and essential governmental functions, and having all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this section and KRS

441.810

, including, but not limited to, the following powers:

To sue and be sued; to have a seal and to alter the same at pleasure; to have perpetual succession; to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the authority; and to make and from time to time amend and repeal bylaws, rules and regulations to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the authority;

To acquire property by lease or purchase, construct, reconstruct or renovate a regional jail and to provide for the operation and maintenance of the facility; and

To exercise the power, authority and duties of counties under this chapter and other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes related to the operations of jails and the incarceration of prisoners.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 415, § 13, effective July 13, 1984.

441.810.
Composition of authority — Appointment — Terms.

The regional jail authority shall be composed of members appointed by the county judges/executive of the respective counties within the authority and the jailer of the county where the regional jail is located. The county judge/executive of the most populous county shall appoint three (3) members to the authority, and the remainder of the county judges/executive shall each appoint two (2) members.

Members of the authority shall serve four (4) year terms, except that one (1) of each county judge/executive’s original appointees shall serve a two (2) year term. Members of the authority shall not be compensated for their service but may be reimbursed for expenses actually incurred.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 415, § 14, effective July 13, 1984.

441.820.
Court facilities in regional jail.

A regional jail may contain court facilities for judicial proceedings not involving a jury.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 415, § 16, effective July 13, 1984.